Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.023

Director appoints members—Nominations—Advisory vote.

(1) The director shall appoint the members of the commission.

(2) Candidates for positions on the commission shall be nominated under RCW 15.28.060.

(3) Not less than sixty days nor more than seventy-five days prior to the commencement of a commission member's term, the director shall cause an advisory vote to be held for the director-appointed positions. Advisory ballots shall be mailed to all affected producers and shall be returned to the director not less than thirty days prior to the commencement of the term. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it is a secret ballot. The names of the two candidates receiving the most votes in the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment to the commission. In the event there are only two candidates nominated for a position, an advisory vote may not be held and the candidates' names shall be forwarded to the director for potential appointment. If only one candidate is nominated for a position, the commission shall select a second candidate whose name will be forwarded to the director.

(4) Any candidate whose name is forwarded to the director for potential appointment shall submit to the director a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to the commission. The director may select either person for the position.

[ 2003 c 396 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.